Utah statutes.
63K-1-501.   Formalities of taking office.
(1)  At the time that they are appointed as emergency interim successors or
special emergency judges, emergency interim successors and special emergency
judges shall sign prospectively whatever oath is required to enable them to
exercise the powers and duties of the office to which they may succeed.
(2)  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person is required to
comply with any other provision of law relative to taking office as a
prerequisite to the exercise of the powers or discharge of the duties of an
office to which the person succeeds.
